Idaho, session 2025, S1052.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 56-1002, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1002. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND WELFARE -- CREATION -- ADMINISTRA-
TIVE REGIONS. (1) There is created and established in the state government a
department of health and welfare which shall, for the purposes of section 20,
article IV of the constitution of the state of Idaho, be an executive depart-
ment of the state government. The executive and administrative power of this
department shall be vested in the director of the department who shall be ap-
pointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor, with the advice and con-
sent of the senate.
(2) The department shall be organized into such administrative and gen-
eral services divisions as may be necessary in order to efficiently adminis-
ter the department. Each division shall be headed by a division administra-
tor who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director with
the concurrence of the board. Any new bureau chief hired to head a bureau
shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director with the con-
currence of the board.
(3) In order to provide more effective and economical access to the
state health and social services by the people of Idaho, the governor is
hereby authorized to establish substate administrative regions. In the
designation of these regions specific consideration shall be given to the
geographic and economic convenience of the citizens included therein. Each
substate administrative region shall be headed by a regional director who
shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director with the con-
currence of the board.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.